Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1401
Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program; designate.

(1)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall designate a Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program in cities of the metropolitan class areas.

(b) The pilot program shall: (i) Operate twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, (ii) be developed in partnership with local grassroots organizations, community stakeholders, and advisors representing youth and families impacted by the juvenile justice system, and (iii) terminate five years after September 1, 2025.

(2) A Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center means a facility designed to provide support, assessment, and intervention services for youth and families involved in, or at risk of, entering the juvenile justice system. The goal of the centers is to offer comprehensive, community-based solutions that address underlying issues contributing to juvenile delinquency, including family dynamics, mental health, substance abuse, and educational challenges.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 1.
The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705(1)(g), has corrected a manifest clerical error in Laws 2025, LB48, section 1, by changing the word "establish" to the word "designate" in subdivision (1)(a) of section 42-1401.